test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D--îwas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xêrox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - -îwas - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, sacred bundle: AEW C-initial NDI1
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîwas
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîwas
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîwatinân
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Sg: kîwatinaw
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîwatiwâw
     
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: wîwas
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: wîwatiwâw
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: wîwatiyiw

     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîwata
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîwata
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîwatinâna
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Pl: kîwatinawa
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîwatiwâwa
     
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: wîwata
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: wîwatiwâwa
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: wîwatiyiwa

     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nîwatihk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kîwatihk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nîwatinâhk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Loc: kîwatinâhk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kîwatiwâhk

     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: wîwatihk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: wîwatiwâhk
     -îwas+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: wîwatiyihk

     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nîwacis,     nîwacisis]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kîwacis,     kîwacisis]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nîwacisinân, nîwacisisinân]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Sg:   [kîwacisinaw, kîwacisisinaw]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kîwacisiwâw, kîwacisisiwâw]

     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [wîwacis,     wîwacisis]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [wîwacisiwâw, wîwacisisiwâw]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [wîwacisiyiw, wîwacisisiyiw]

     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nîwacisa,     nîwacisisa]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kîwacisa,     kîwacisisa]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nîwacisinâna, nîwacisisinâna]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px12Pl+Pl:   [kîwacisinawa, kîwacisisinawa]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kîwacisiwâwa, kîwacisisiwâwa]
     
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [wîwacisa,      wîwacisisa]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [wîwacisiwâwa,  wîwacisisiwâwa]
     -îwas+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [wîwacisiyiwa,  wîwacisisiyiwa]
